Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.721, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Scope. The sections referred to in deleted text begin subdivisions 2 to 7deleted text end new text begin this sectionnew text end are codified outside this chapter. Those sections classify transportation data as other than public, place restrictions on access to government data, or involve data sharing. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.721, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Clean transportation standard program. new text end new text begin Certain data on the clean transportation standard program are governed by section 174B.15. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [174B.02] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Applicable standard. new text end new text begin "Applicable standard" means the clean transportation standard that applies for a given year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Carbon dioxide equivalent. new text end new text begin "Carbon dioxide equivalent" means the number of metric tons of carbon dioxide emissions that have the same global warming potential as one metric ton of another greenhouse gas. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Carbon intensity. new text end new text begin "Carbon intensity" means the quantity of all life cycle greenhouse gas emissions throughout the fuel pathway associated with use of a unit of a specific transportation fuel, expressed in grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule of energy in the transportation fuel, as calculated by the relevant GREET model. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Carbon intensity score. new text end new text begin "Carbon intensity score" means the carbon intensity specifically calculated for a fuel provider using an identified transportation fuel. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Clean fuel. new text end new text begin "Clean fuel" means a transportation fuel that has a carbon intensity level below the applicable standard. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Clean transportation standard. new text end new text begin "Clean transportation standard" means the goal and standards on reduction of carbon intensity established under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Continuous living cover cropping systems. new text end new text begin "Continuous living cover cropping systems" means agricultural systems characterized by living plants above ground and living roots in the soil throughout the entire year, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) perennial crops, including forage and pasture; new text end new text begin (2) winter annual cash cover crops such as winter camelina and pennycress; and new text end new text begin (3) agroforestry practices. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Credit. new text end new text begin (a) "Credit" means a unit of measure of the degree to which the carbon intensity in a volume of a fuel provider's transportation fuel is lower than the carbon intensity embodied in the applicable standard for that volume. Credit includes a credit premium, as provided in section 174B.15, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (b) One credit is equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Credit generator. new text end new text begin "Credit generator" means an entity that produces or imports a transportation fuel for use in Minnesota whose carbon intensity generates credits. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Deficit. new text end new text begin (a) "Deficit" means a unit of measure of the degree to which the carbon intensity in a volume of a fuel provider's transportation fuel is greater than the carbon intensity embodied in the applicable standard for that volume. new text end new text begin (b) One deficit is equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Deficit generator. new text end new text begin "Deficit generator" means a fuel provider who first produces and imports a transportation fuel for use in Minnesota whose carbon intensity generates deficits. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Department. new text end new text begin "Department" means the Department of Transportation. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Fuel pathway. new text end new text begin "Fuel pathway" means all stages of production and use for a specific transportation fuel, including but not limited to feedstock production, extraction, processing, refining, transportation, storage, distribution, and combustion or use by an end user. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Fuel provider. new text end new text begin "Fuel provider" means an entity that supplies a transportation fuel for use in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Global warming potential. new text end new text begin "Global warming potential" means a quantitative measure of a greenhouse gas emission's potential to contribute to global warming over a 100-year period, expressed in terms of the equivalent carbon dioxide emissions that would be required to produce the same 100-year warming effect, as reported in the Sixth Assessment Report on Climate Change of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Greenhouse gas. new text end new text begin "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, or sulfur hexafluoride. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Program. new text end new text begin "Program" means the clean transportation standard and the accompanying requirements under this chapter, including but not limited to policies, procedures, and associated rules. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Relevant GREET model. new text end new text begin "Relevant GREET model" means the most recent version of the GREET model as determined by the commissioner under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Soil-healthy farming practices. new text end new text begin "Soil-healthy farming practices" means farming practices that increase the quantity of organic carbon in soil, including but not limited to reduced tillage, conservation tillage, cover cropping, perennial cropping, inter-seeding, organic production, manure management, roller-crimping, managed rotational grazing, precision agriculture, crop rotations, and changes in grazing management. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Technology provider. new text end new text begin "Technology provider" means a manufacturer of an end-use consumer technology involved in supplying clean fuels. new text end new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin Transportation fuel. new text end new text begin (a) "Transportation fuel" means electricity or a liquid or gaseous fuel that is blended, sold, supplied, offered for sale, or used in Minnesota to propel: a motor vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 42; an aircraft, as defined in section 360.013, subdivision 37; a light rail transit or commuter rail vehicle; an off-highway vehicle, as defined in section 84.771; a snowmobile, as defined in section 84.81, subdivision 3; a train or locomotive; special mobile equipment, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 31; a watercraft; or other conveyance commonly recognized as a vehicle. new text end new text begin (b) Transportation fuel includes but is not limited to electricity used as fuel in a motor vehicle, gasoline, diesel, ethanol, biodiesel, biomethane, aviation gasoline, hydrogen, jet fuel, renewable diesel, natural gas, renewable natural gas, propane, and renewable propane. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [174B.10] CLEAN TRANSPORTATION STANDARD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Clean transportation fuel goal. new text end new text begin It is the goal of the state to reduce the aggregate carbon intensity of transportation fuel supplied to Minnesota to net zero life cycle greenhouse gas emissions on and after 2050. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Annual standards schedule. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish an annual standards schedule that: new text end new text begin (1) sets a standard in each year for the aggregate carbon intensity for transportation fuel in Minnesota, which must not include exempt fuel under section 174B.15, subdivision 7; and new text end new text begin (2) specifies decreases in the aggregate carbon intensity by at least: new text end new text begin (i) 25 percent below the baseline level under paragraph (b), measured at ten years after the year of enactment of this section; and new text end new text begin (ii) 75 percent below the baseline level under paragraph (b), measured at 20 years after the year of enactment of this section. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must evaluate available scientific data and calculations to calculate a baseline level that identifies the aggregate carbon intensity of transportation fuel supplied to Minnesota for calendar year 2018, excluding the components of transportation fuel from ethanol, biodiesel, or other biofuel. new text end new text begin (c) In establishing or revising the annual standards schedule, the commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) consider the cost of compliance with the clean transportation standard; new text end new text begin (2) consider the technologies available to fuel providers and technology providers to achieve the standard; new text end new text begin (3) evaluate the impact of the standard on achieving the state greenhouse gas emissions reduction goal under section 216H.02, subdivision 1, paragraph (a); and new text end new text begin (4) consult with the Public Utilities Commission and the commissioners of agriculture, commerce, health, natural resources, and the Pollution Control Agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program development; objectives. new text end new text begin In implementing the requirements under the program, the commissioner must endeavor to foster a fuel-neutral clean fuels portfolio in the state that: new text end new text begin (1) creates broad rural and urban economic development; new text end new text begin (2) provides benefits for communities, consumers, clean fuel providers, technology providers, and feedstock suppliers; new text end new text begin (3) increases energy security by expanding the supply of domestically produced fuels; new text end new text begin (4) supports equitable transportation electrification powered primarily with low-carbon and carbon-free electricity that benefits all communities; new text end new text begin (5) improves air quality and public health, targeting communities that bear a disproportionate health burden from pollution from transportation fuels; new text end new text begin (6) supports state solid waste recycling goals by facilitating credit generation from renewable natural gas produced from organic waste; new text end new text begin (7) aims to support, through credit generation or other financial means, the adoption of agricultural practices that benefit soil health and water quality while contributing to lower life cycle greenhouse gas emissions from clean fuel feedstocks; new text end new text begin (8) maximizes benefits to the environment and natural resources, develops safeguards and incentives to protect natural lands, and enhances environmental integrity, including biodiversity; new text end new text begin (9) is the result of extensive outreach efforts to stakeholders and communities that bear a disproportionate health burden from pollution from transportation or from the production and transportation of transportation fuels; new text end new text begin (10) aims to avoid contributing to further consolidation in the livestock industry; and new text end new text begin (11) aims to maintain and enhance organized labor employment in the transportation fuel sector. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Fuel pathway and carbon intensity determination. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish a process to determine the carbon intensity of transportation fuels and allow each fuel producer to apply for and be assigned a fuel pathway and carbon intensity score based on unique production practices. Fuel pathways must be determined using the relevant GREET model. The fuel pathway determination process must: new text end new text begin (1) be consistent for all fuel types; new text end new text begin (2) be based on science and engineering; new text end new text begin (3) reflect differences in vehicle fuel efficiency and drivetrains; new text end new text begin (4) account for any on-site additional energy use by a carbon capture technology employed in the fuel production process, including but not limited to generation, distillation, and compression; new text end new text begin (5) be based on state-specific and production facility-specific data; and new text end new text begin (6) include a nonzero emissions factor reflecting indirect land use change for cropland-derived fuels, not less than the emissions factor derived from the relevant GREET model. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) determine appropriate fuel pathways; and new text end new text begin (2) coordinate with third-party entities or other states to review and approve pathways. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin GREET model. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide for the Argonne National Laboratory's GREET model to be adapted to Minnesota for use in the program and must arrange updates to the model as appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Periodic review. new text end new text begin No less frequently than every five years, the commissioner must conduct a periodic review of clean transportation standard implementation and evaluate progress toward program goals. The review must include evaluation of potential adjustments to credit prices under section 174B.15, subdivision 6, to minimize any impacts to consumers caused by increased retail fuel prices. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin (a) To the extent practicable, the commissioner must adopt rules to implement the clean transportation standard program. Rules adopted under this section are exempt from the time limit under section 14.125. The commissioner may revise the rules as necessary, including as part of the periodic review process under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (b) When developing proposed rules under this chapter, the commissioner must consult with: new text end new text begin (1) the Public Utilities Commission and the commissioners of agriculture, commerce, health, natural resources, and the Pollution Control Agency; and new text end new text begin (2) an advisory committee as provided under section 14.101, subdivision 2, composed of equitable representatives from agriculture; transportation fuel providers; consumers; rural, urban, and Tribal communities; environmental organizations; environmental justice organizations; technology providers; automotive manufacturers; the forestry sector; utilities; and electric vehicle charging companies. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must commence rulemaking no later than 45 days after the date of enactment of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Application; implementation. new text end new text begin The requirements of the clean transportation standard program apply to credit and deficit generators beginning as specified in the rules adopted under subdivision 7. The commissioner must provide a notification of the commencement date to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation, agriculture, commerce, energy, and environment finance and policy. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [174B.15] CREDITS AND DEFICITS; PROGRAM MARKET. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Compliance. new text end new text begin A deficit generator must comply with the annual standards schedule for the aggregate carbon intensity of transportation fuel, as established under section 174B.10, subdivision 2, by: new text end new text begin (1) producing or importing transportation fuels whose carbon intensity is at or below the level of the applicable standard; new text end new text begin (2) purchasing sufficient credits to offset any aggregate deficits resulting from the carbon intensity of the deficit generator's transportation fuels exceeding the applicable standard; or new text end new text begin (3) performing a combination of clauses (1) and (2). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit generation. new text end new text begin A credit may be generated when transportation fuel is produced, imported, or provided for use in Minnesota and the carbon intensity of the fuel is less than the applicable standard. The commissioner must ensure that a particular unit of fuel may generate credits only once. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credits; program market; credit calculation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) establish and regulate the operation of a program market to trade transportation fuel credits and deficits, which may include: new text end new text begin (i) a market mechanism that allows credits to be traded or banked for future use; new text end new text begin (ii) transaction fees associated with the credit market; new text end new text begin (iii) procedures to verify the validity of credits and deficits generated by a fuel provider under this section; and new text end new text begin (iv) a process to assign credits as an offset under an order to meet the applicable standard, as provided under section 174B.25, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) prohibit generation of credits from: new text end new text begin (i) carbon capture and storage that: new text end new text begin (A) lacks permanence certification from a recognized saline aquifer or other permanent sequestration technique; or new text end new text begin (B) is performed for enhanced oil recovery or storage in depleted oil and gas wells; new text end new text begin (ii) the production of biofuels from feedstock grown on croplands with fewer than five consecutive years of cropping history; and new text end new text begin (iii) renewable natural gas produced from any new or expanded agricultural livestock production facility or manure digesters; new text end new text begin (3) provide for an additional credit premium of five percent for cropland-derived biofuels produced on acreage that utilizes soil-healthy farming practices and fertilizer best management practices; and new text end new text begin (4) provide for an additional credit premium of ten percent for cropland-derived biofuels produced on acreage that utilizes continuous living cover cropping systems. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must establish methods to verify credit premiums under paragraph (a), clauses (3) and (4), including but not limited to satellite and aerial verification, and must require verification to occur annually. Verification reporting must rely on aggregate data. Data collected for the verification are nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Carbon intensity score; biofuels. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, the commissioner must use the relevant GREET model to develop a statewide average direct carbon intensity value for cropland-derived biofuel feedstocks that is used as a component to determine the carbon intensity of biofuel production. new text end new text begin (b) In consultation with the commissioners of agriculture and the Pollution Control Agency, the commissioner must develop procedures to allow a biofuel producer to calculate a unique carbon intensity score for biofuel feedstocks from cropland-derived biofuels using the relevant GREET model and other models, taking into account impacts on farm-related emissions and sequestration of greenhouse gases. The unique carbon intensity score under this paragraph may be used as an alternative to the state-specific average described under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) The procedures developed under paragraph (b) must include a methodology for calculating, monitoring, and annual third-party auditing and verification of on-farm practices. On-farm practices include but are not limited to reduced tillage, no-till, reduced on-farm fuel use, reduced use of fertilizers and other inputs, use of low-carbon-intensity fertilizer, use of cover crops, use of continuous living cover cropping systems, application of biochar, soil-healthy farming practices, and other relevant practices that can impact the carbon intensity of biofuel feedstock. new text end new text begin (d) In consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner must develop procedures to allow a biofuel producer to develop a unique carbon intensity score for biofuel feedstocks from: new text end new text begin (1) wood and wood waste that reflects the potential to either enhance or degrade forest carbon sinks; or new text end new text begin (2) climate-smart forestry practices to enhance forest carbon sinks. new text end new text begin (e) The procedures developed under paragraph (d) must include a methodology for calculating, monitoring, and annual third-party auditing and verification of climate-smart forestry practices. new text end new text begin (f) Data collected on a biofuel producer under paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) are nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin (g) A biofuel producer that elects to utilize a unique carbon intensity score under paragraph (b) is prohibited from claiming the credit premiums under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Credits; residential electric vehicle charging; transportation electrification. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "credit revenue" means money or other financial consideration obtained in exchange for credits through the program market. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must develop procedures to allow for generation of credits for electric vehicle charging that occurs in residences and must provide guidance on the expenditure of credit revenue. new text end new text begin (c) Credit revenue generated from residential electric vehicle charging must be expended to promote equitable statewide transportation electrification, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) electric vehicle purchase incentives; new text end new text begin (2) electric vehicle charging equipment and infrastructure; and new text end new text begin (3) other transportation electrification initiatives. new text end new text begin (d) At least 60 percent of the credit revenue generated from residential electric vehicle charging must be spent to support transportation electrification for the primary benefit of rural areas and environmental justice areas, as defined in section 116.065. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this chapter precludes the commissioner from adopting rules that allow the generation of credits associated with electric or alternative transportation fuels or infrastructure that existed prior to the effective date of this act or the start date of program requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Consumers. new text end new text begin The commissioner must allow for adjustments to the program market in response to either: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrated evidence that credit prices are impacting retail fuel prices; or new text end new text begin (2) the need to maintain a sufficient credit price to spur further innovation in the clean fuels market. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Exemptions; exempt fuel credits. new text end new text begin (a) A fuel provider is exempt from the annual standards schedule under section 174B.10, subdivision 2, and generating deficits under the program for any fuel used in aviation, train locomotives, marine use, and military use. new text end new text begin (b) A fuel provider may voluntarily elect to enter an exempt fuel into the program and be able to generate credits for the exempt fuel in the manner provided under this section. This authorization applies whether or not the fuel provider is otherwise subject to the requirements of this chapter. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [174B.20] PROGRAM FEES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment and procedures. new text end new text begin (a) As provided in this section, credit and deficit generators subject to the clean transportation standard program must pay a program fee. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must identify credit and deficit generators and must establish a process for credit and deficit generator registration in the program, credit and deficit generator reporting, annual determination of the program fee and specific amounts charged, a payment schedule, and public comment and response. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Clean transportation standard account. new text end new text begin (a) A clean transportation standard program account is created in the special revenue fund. The account consists of all money received from fees and penalties under this chapter and any other money donated, allotted, transferred, or otherwise provided to the account. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated to the commissioner from the account must be used to develop and implement the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program budget; fee limitation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must annually develop a program budget that includes: new text end new text begin (1) specification of total expenditures; new text end new text begin (2) a review of expenditure categories and administrative costs; new text end new text begin (3) an analysis of the workload and capacity to administer the program; new text end new text begin (4) a listing of credit and deficit generators, including any anticipated changes to the listing; new text end new text begin (5) a calculation of the program fee in conformance with the limitations under paragraph (b) and the requirements under this section; and new text end new text begin (6) an analysis of the program fee allocation under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (b) The total expenditures specified in the program budget must match and not exceed the total projected costs to the department for program implementation in that fiscal year, including all costs associated with administering the program. The commissioner must set the program fee in each fiscal year so that total revenue from the fee does not exceed the total expenditures specified in the budget. This fee is exempt from section 16A.1283. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Fee allocation. new text end new text begin (a) For each fiscal year, the commissioner must set the program fee so that: new text end new text begin (1) an amount equal to 95 percent of the program budget expenditures is paid by deficit generators, allocated as provided in paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (2) an amount equal to five percent of the program budget expenditures is paid as follows: new text end new text begin (i) for initial program development and the first year of program implementation, the amount is distributed equally among all credit generators; and new text end new text begin (ii) for subsequent years, the amount is distributed equally among all credit and deficit generators. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must allocate the amount paid under paragraph (a), clause (1), based on the number of deficits generated by a deficit generator, so that: new text end new text begin (1) the highest 30 percent of deficit generators pay 70 percent of the amount; new text end new text begin (2) the second highest 30 percent of deficit generators pay 20 percent; new text end new text begin (3) the third highest 30 percent of deficit generators pay ten percent; and new text end new text begin (4) the lowest ten percent of deficit generators are exempt from paying an amount. new text end new text begin (c) The payments required under paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3), are distributed equally among the appropriate deficit generators. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must identify deficits and deficit generators that are subject to a program fee for each year based on registration or compliance reports for the previous year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Public notice and comment. new text end new text begin At least 60 days before imposing the program fee each year, the commissioner must publish the program budget and the information required under subdivision 3 on the department's website. The commissioner must: new text end new text begin (1) provide for a public comment period of at least 30 days; new text end new text begin (2) evaluate public comments; new text end new text begin (3) provide appropriate responses as necessary; and new text end new text begin (4) consider warranted revisions to the program budget and program fee. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [174B.25] REGULATION AND COMPLIANCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General regulatory powers. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with the commissioners of agriculture, commerce, and the Pollution Control Agency, the commissioner must establish policies and procedures that govern requirements and enforcement of the clean transportation standard. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may: new text end new text begin (1) establish conditions, standards, limitations, or other requirements as necessary to ensure compliance with the program while encouraging voluntary program participation; new text end new text begin (2) perform audits, compliance reviews, and investigations of credit and deficit generators and other program participants; new text end new text begin (3) issue an order (i) requiring compliance or corrective action to meet the applicable standard, or (ii) requiring a violation under the program to be corrected; and new text end new text begin (4) issue a civil penalty as provided in this section. new text end new text begin (c) A corrective order issued by the commissioner may require any identified violations to be corrected within 30 calendar days of the date the order is received. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Fuel provider reports. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the commissioners of agriculture, commerce, and the Pollution Control Agency, the commissioner must develop a process for credit and deficit generators to annually report compliance with the applicable standard to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) A credit or deficit generator must report in the manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Civil penalty; amount. new text end new text begin (a) After completion of an inspection, compliance review, or other investigation, the commissioner may issue a civil penalty to an entity that is subject to the requirements under this chapter or an associated rule and has committed an identified violation. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may determine a penalty amount of up to $....... and must determine the amount based on: new text end new text begin (1) the willfulness of the violation; new text end new text begin (2) the gravity of the violation, including its effect on program compliance and credit or deficit values; new text end new text begin (3) the history of past violations; new text end new text begin (4) the number of violations; new text end new text begin (5) the economic benefit gained by the entity by allowing or committing the violation; and new text end new text begin (6) other factors specifically identified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) For a subsequent violation, the commissioner must determine a penalty amount based on the factors in paragraph (b) and the: new text end new text begin (1) similarity of the last violation and the violation to be penalized; new text end new text begin (2) time elapsed since the last violation; new text end new text begin (3) number of previous violations; and new text end new text begin (4) response of the violator to the last violation identified. new text end new text begin (d) The recipient of a civil penalty under this subdivision must notify the commissioner within 30 days in writing if the recipient intends to contest the civil penalty. If within 30 days after receiving the civil penalty the recipient fails to notify the commissioner of intent to contest the penalty, the civil penalty is not subject to further review. new text end new text begin (e) Civil penalties assessed under this subdivision may be appealed as a contested case under chapter 14. The commissioner may recover civil penalties in a civil action. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Civil penalty; information. new text end new text begin When issuing a civil penalty under subdivision 3, the commissioner must provide to the recipient: new text end new text begin (1) a concise statement of the facts alleged to constitute a violation; new text end new text begin (2) a citation or reference to the specific requirements alleged to have been violated, including any appropriate section of a statute, rule, applicable standard, variance, order, stipulation agreement, or term or condition of a permit or license; new text end new text begin (3) a statement of the penalty amount imposed and the factors upon which the amount is based; and new text end new text begin (4) a summary of the process to contest the penalty. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [174B.30] LEGISLATIVE REPORT. new text end new text begin (a) By February 1 two years after the effective date of rules adopted under section 174B.10, subdivision 7, and by every other February 1 thereafter, the commissioner must submit a report on the program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation, agriculture, commerce, energy, and environment finance and policy. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an overview of the program and program implementation; new text end new text begin (2) an evaluation of program compliance by fuel providers, including a review of any issuance of corrective orders and civil penalties; new text end new text begin (3) a review of the program market under section 174B.15; new text end new text begin (4) a summary of the results of third-party auditing and verification of on-farm practices and agroforestry practices under section 174B.15, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (5) a review of the current and recent annual program budgets and program fees under section 174B.20, including a summary of public comment and actions taken in response; new text end new text begin (6) a review of the fiscal impacts of the clean transportation standard; and new text end new text begin (7) recommended legislative and rulemaking changes, if any. new text end new text begin (c) A report submitted under this section must include information on the results of any review conducted under section 174B.10, subdivision 6, in the previous 12 months. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must publish information about the program on the department's website. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin CLEAN TRANSPORTATION STANDARD; INITIAL FEE.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of transportation must establish and impose an initial fee for the clean transportation standard program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 174B. Subject to the requirements in this section, the initial fee must be calculated and imposed in the same manner as provided for the program fee under Minnesota Statutes, section 174B.20. The initial fee must be imposed in each year in which the commissioner projects initial program development and implementation costs but the clean transportation standard program has not otherwise commenced in effect. A fee under this section is exempt from Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.1283. new text end new text begin (b) The initial fee must match and must not exceed (1) the total projected costs to the Department of Transportation for initial program development and implementation in a fiscal year, minus (2) any amount appropriated in law for purposes of the clean transportation standard program. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, initial program development and implementation costs include but are not limited to administrative and rulemaking costs. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CLEAN TRANSPORTATION STANDARD IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean transportation standard account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of transportation to implement the clean transportation standard program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 174B. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end